Hawaii statutes.
§291E-32 Criminal prosecution. (a)
Criminal prosecution under section 291E-61 or 291E-61.5 may be commenced
concurrently with administrative revocation proceedings under this part;
provided that documentary and testimonial evidence provided by the respondent
during the administrative proceeding shall not be admissible against the
respondent in any proceeding under section 291E-61 or 291E-61.5 arising out of
the same occurrence.

(b) When a person's license and privilege to
operate a vehicle is revoked under this part and the person also is convicted
of an offense under section 291E-61 or 291E-61.5 arising out of the same
occurrence, the total period of revocation imposed in the two proceedings shall
not exceed the longer period of revocation imposed in either proceeding. If
the person is convicted under section 291E-61 or 291E-61.5 prior to completion
of administrative proceedings, the person shall surrender the temporary permit
issued under this part at the time of entry of a plea of guilty or no contest,
entry of a verdict of guilty, or of sentencing, whichever occurs first. [L
2000, c 189, pt of §23; am L 2004, c 90, §7]

Previous
Vol05_Ch0261-0319
Next